en: Hang Gliding & Skydiving
xx: Hang Gliding & Skydiving
cs: Závěsné létání a parašutismus
da: Hanggliding og faldskærmsudspring
de: Drachenfliegen & Fallschirmspringen
es: Ala delta y paracaidismo
fr: Deltaplane et parachutisme
it: Paracadutismo e volo libero
ja: ハンググライダー・スカイダイビング
nl: Hanggliding en skydiving
no: Hanggliding og fallskjermhopping
pl: Paralotniarstwo i spadochroniarstwo
pt: Asa-delta e paraquedismo
ru: Товары для дельтапланеризма и прыжков с парашютом
sv: Flygsport
tr: Yelken Kanat ve Serbest Paraşüt

en: Air Suits
xx: Air Suits
cs: Létací obleky
da: Flyvedragt
de: Fluganzüge
es: Monos de salto
fr: Combinaisons pour sports aériens
it: Tute da paracadutismo
ja: エアスーツ
nl: Vliegpakken
no: Fallskjermdrakter
pl: Kostiumy powietrzne
pt: Uniformes de voo livre
ru: Костюмы для воздушного спорта
sv: Flygdräkter
tr: Uçuş Giysileri

en: Hang Gliders
xx: Hang Gliders
cs: Rogala
da: Dragefly
de: Hängegleiter
es: Ala delta
fr: Deltaplanes
it: Deltaplani
ja: ハンググライダー
nl: Hanggliders
no: Hangglidere
pl: Lotnie
pt: Asas-deltas
ru: Дельтапланы
sv: Hängglidare
tr: Askılı Planörler

en: Parachutes
xx: Parachutes
cs: Padáky
da: Faldskærme
de: Fallschirme
es: Paracaídas
fr: Parachutes
it: Paracaduti
ja: パラシュート
nl: Parachutes
no: Fallskjermer
pl: Spadochrony
pt: Paraquedas
ru: Парашюты
sv: Fallskärmar
tr: Paraşütler

en: Hunting & Shooting
xx: Hunting & Shooting
cs: Lov a střelba
da: Jagt og skydning
de: Jagen und Schießen
es: Caza y tiro
fr: Chasse et tir
it: Caccia e tiro a segno
ja: 狩猟・射撃
nl: Jagen en schieten
no: Jakt og skyting
pl: Myślistwo i strzelectwo
pt: Caça e tiro
ru: Товары для охоты и стрельбы
sv: Jakt och skytte
tr: Avcılık ve Atıcılık

en: Archery
xx: Archery
cs: Lukostřelba
da: Bueskydning
de: Bogenschießen
es: Tiro con arco
fr: Tir à l'arc
it: Tiro con l'arco
ja: アーチェリー
nl: Boogschieten
no: Bueskyting
pl: Łucznictwo
pt: Tiro com arco
ru: Товары для стрельбы из лука
sv: Bågskytte
tr: Okçuluk

en: Archery Armguards
xx: Archery Armguards
cs: Chrániče předloktí
da: Armbeskyttere til bueskydning
de: Armschutz für Bogenschützen
es: Brazaleras de tiro con arco
fr: Protège-bras pour le tir à l'arc
it: Parabraccio tiro con l'arco
ja: アーチェリー用アームガード
nl: Armbeschermers voor boogschieten
no: Armbeskyttere for bueskyting
pl: Ochraniacze na ramię
pt: Escudos de proteção para tiro com arco
ru: Защита для рук при стрельбе из лука
sv: Armskydd för bågskytte
tr: Okçu Kollukları

en: Archery Gloves & Releases
xx: Archery Gloves & Releases
cs: Rukavice a vypouštěče pro lukostřelbu
da: Handsker og releaser til buer
de: Handschuhe & Auslöser
es: Guantes y disparadores para tiro con arco
fr: Gants et décocheurs de tir à l'arc
it: Guanti e sganci per tiro con l'arco
ja: アーチェリー用グローブ・リリーサー
nl: Handschoenen en releases voor boogschieten
no: Hansker og releases til bueskyting
pl: Rękawice oraz spusty łucznicze
pt: Luvas e gatilhos para tiro com arco
ru: Перчатки и спусковые механизмы для стрельбы из лука
sv: Handskar och utlösningsmekanismer för bågskytte
tr: Okçuluk Eldivenleri ve Tetikleri

en: Archery Targets
xx: Archery Targets
cs: Lukostřelecké terče
da: Bueskydningsskiver
de: Zielscheiben für Bogenschießen
es: Dianas de tiro con arco
fr: Cibles de tir à l'arc
it: Bersagli tiro con l'arco
ja: アーチェリー標的
nl: Doelwitten voor boogschieten
no: Blinker til bueskyting
pl: Tarcze łucznicze
pt: Alvos para tiro com arco
ru: Мишени для стрельбы из лука
sv: Måltavlor för bågskytte
tr: Ok Hedefleri

en: Arrow Parts & Accessories
xx: Arrow Parts & Accessories
cs: Díly a doplňky k šípům
da: Piledele og tilbehør
de: Pfeilelemente & Zubehör
es: Accesorios y piezas para flechas
fr: Accessoires et pièces de flèches
it: Parti frecce e accessori
ja: 矢関連用品
nl: Pijlonderdelen en -accessoires
no: Pildeler og tilbehør
pl: Części i akcesoria do strzał
pt: Peças e acessórios para flechas
ru: Принадлежности и части стрел
sv: Pildelar och tillbehör
tr: Ok Parçaları ve Aksesuarları

en: Arrow Fletchings
xx: Arrow Fletchings
cs: Křidélka šípů
da: Styrefjer til pile
de: Steuerfedern
es: Remeras para flechas
fr: Empennes de flèches
it: Alette per frecce
ja: 矢制作
nl: Pijlveren
no: Styrefjær til piler
pl: Lotki do strzał
pt: Rêmiges de flecha
ru: Оперение стрел
sv: Styrfjädrar för pilar
tr: Ok Tüyleri

en: Arrow Nocks
xx: Arrow Nocks
cs: Končíky šípů
da: Pilekærv
de: Nocken
es: Culatines para flechas
fr: Encoches de flèches
it: Cocche per frecce
ja: ノック
nl: Pijlnokken
no: Nocks til piler
pl: Końcówki strzał
pt: Rabeiras de flecha
ru: Хвостовики стрел
sv: Pilnockar
tr: Ok Arkalıkları

en: Broadheads & Field Points
xx: Broadheads & Field Points
cs: Hroty šípů
da: Jagtspidser og pilespidser
de: Jagdspitzen & Feldspitzen
es: Puntas de caza y campo
fr: Pointes à lames et pointes de parcours
it: Punte ampie o da campo
ja: ブロードヘッド・ポイント
nl: Jachtpunten en veldpunten
no: Jakt- og feltspisser
pl: Groty do strzał
pt: Pontas de caça e broadheads
ru: Спортивные и охотничьи наконечники для стрел
sv: Broadhead-spetsar och kulspetsar
tr: Bıçaklı Ok Uçları ve Ahşap Ok Uçları

en: Arrows & Bolts
xx: Arrows & Bolts
cs: Šípy a šipky
da: Pile
de: Pfeile
es: Flechas y dardos
fr: Flèches et carreaux
it: Frecce e dardi
ja: 矢
nl: Pijlen en schichten
no: Piler og bolter
pl: Strzały
pt: Flechas e dardos
ru: Стрелы для луков и арбалетов
sv: Pilar och skäktor
tr: Oklar ve Dart Okları

en: Bow & Crossbow Accessories
xx: Bow & Crossbow Accessories
cs: Luky a kuše – příslušenství
da: Reservedele og tilbehør til buer og armbrøste
de: Bogen- & Armbrustteile & -zubehör
es: Accesorios para arcos y ballestas
fr: Pièces et accessoires d'arcs et arbalètes
it: Componenti e accessori per arco e balestra
ja: ボウ・クロスボウ関連用品
nl: Onderdelen en accessoires voor bogen en kruisbogen
no: Tilbehør til buer og armbrøst
pl: Akcesoria do łuków i kusz
pt: Peças e acessórios de arcos e bestas
ru: Принадлежности для луков и арбалетов
sv: Delar och tillbehör för pilbågar och armborstar
tr: Yay ve Arbalet Parçaları ve Aksesuarları

en: Bows & Crossbows
xx: Bows & Crossbows
cs: Luky a kuše
da: Buer og armbrøste
de: Bögen & Armbrüste
es: Arcos y ballestas
fr: Arcs et arbalètes
it: Archi e balestre
ja: ボウ・クロスボウ
nl: Bogen en kruisbogen
no: Buer og armbrøst
pl: Łuki i kusze
pt: Arcos e bestas
ru: Луки и арбалеты
sv: Pilbågar och armborstar
tr: Yaylar ve Arbaletler

en: Compound Bows
xx: Compound Bows
cs: Kladkové luky
da: Compoundbuer
de: Compoundbögen
es: Arcos compuestos
fr: Arcs à poulies
it: Archi compositi
ja: コンパウンドボウ
nl: Compoundboog
no: Sammensatte buer
pl: Łuki bloczkowe
pt: Arcos compostos
ru: Блочные луки
sv: Compoundbågar
tr: Bileşik Yaylar

en: Crossbows
xx: Crossbows
cs: Kuše
da: Armbrøster
de: Armbrüste
es: Ballestas
fr: Arbalètes
it: Balestre
ja: クロスボウ
nl: Kruisbogen
no: Armbrøst
pl: Kusze
pt: Bestas
ru: Арбалеты
sv: Armborst
tr: Arbaletler

en: Recurve & Longbows
xx: Recurve & Longbows
cs: Reflexní a přímé luky
da: Langbuer
de: Langbögen
es: Arcos largos y recurvos
fr: Arcs classiques et droits
it: Archi lunghi e ricurvi
ja: ロングボウ
nl: Hand- en recurvebogen
no: Langbuer
pl: Łuki strzeleckie
pt: Arcos longos e arcos recurvos
ru: Длинные луки
sv: Recurve- och långbågar
tr: Olimpik ve Uzun Yaylar

en: Quivers
xx: Quivers
cs: Toulce
da: Pilekoggere
de: Köcher
es: Carcajes
fr: Carquois
it: Faretre
ja: クイーバー・矢筒
nl: Pijlkokers
no: Pilkogger
pl: Kołczany
pt: Aljavas
ru: Колчаны
sv: Koger
tr: Sadaklar